District of Columbia statutes.
47-1812.11

Repealed

Credits and refunds for overpayments.

Repealed.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 355, ch. 258, art. I, title XII, § 11
May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 133, ch. 146, title IV, § 418
Mar. 31, 1956, 70 Stat. 78, ch. 154, § 12
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 574, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 156(f)
Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-158, § 4, 25 DCR 7002
Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-92, § 502(c), 27 DCR 3390
June 11, 1982, D.C. Law 4-118, § 118, 29 DCR 1770
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-154, § 2, 29 DCR 3486
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-166, § 33(g)(1), 33 DCR 6710
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-183, § 2, 33 DCR 7669
Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-29, § 2(l)(5), 34 DCR 5097
Sept. 21, 1988, D.C. Law 7-141, § 2(f), 35 DCR 5398
Sept. 24, 1993, D.C. Law 10-15, § 301, 40 DCR 5420
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(z)(2), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-1812.11.
1973 Ed., § 47-1586j.

Appropriations authorized for making refunds and for payment of judgments entered against District Government: Section 106 of Pub. L. 104-194, 110 Stat. 2365, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1997, provided that there are appropriated from the applicable funds of the District of Columbia such sums as may be necessary for making refunds and for the payment of judgments that have been entered against the District of Columbia government: Provided, that nothing contained in the section shall be construed as modifying or affecting the provisions of (c)(3) of this section.

Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”